Hawaii statutes.
§412:5-405 Termination of authority of
intra-Pacific bank holding company. (a) A financial institution holding
company ceases to be an intra-Pacific bank holding company at such time as it
no longer meets the definition of an intra-Pacific bank holding company under
section 412:5-400.

(b) A financial institution holding company
which loses its status as an intra-Pacific bank holding company shall
immediately divest itself of its direct or indirect control of any financial
institution subsidiary chartered or approved by this State. Failure to
accomplish such divestiture within thirty days after termination of its
intra-Pacific bank holding company status shall be grounds for the suspension
or revocation of the financial institution subsidiary's charter or approval. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next